Montana, session 2025, SB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 75-26-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-26-301. Definitions. As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Board" means the board of environmental review provided for in 2-15-3502.
(2) "Commission" means the public service commission provided for in 2-15-2602.
(2)(3) "Decommission" or "decommissioning" means:
(a) except as provided in 75-26-304(2) [section 2(4)], the removal of buildings, cabling, electrical
components, roads, or any other facilities associated with a wind generation or solar facility;
(b) except as provided in 75-26-304(2) [section 2(4)], reclamation of surface lands to the previous
grade and to comparable productivity in order to prevent adverse hydrologic effects; and
(c) (i) the removal of the solar facility after the end of the facility's useful life or abandonment; or
(ii) the removal of an aboveground wind turbine tower after the end of a wind generation facility's
useful life or abandonment.
(3)(4) "Department" means the department of environmental quality provided for in 2-15-3501.
(4)(5) "Owner" means a person who owns a wind generation or solar facility used for the generation
of electricity.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
(5)(6) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, company, association, corporation, city, town,
or local governmental government entity or any other state, federal, or private entity, whether organized for
profit or not.
(6)(7) "Repurposed" means having made a significant investment in an existing wind generation or
solar facility to extend the useful life of the facility by more than 5 years.
(7)(8) "Solar facility" means an installation or combination of solar panels or plates, including a
canopy or array, that captures and converts solar radiation to produce electricity and includes flat plate,
focusing solar collectors, or photovoltaic solar cells that:
(a) has a nameplate capacity greater than or equal to 2 megawatts; and
(b) produces electricity that is not consumed on the premises of the solar facility or on land
immediately adjacent to the premises of the solar facility.
(8)(9) "Wind generation facility" means any combination of a physically connected wind turbine or
turbines, associated prime movers, and other associated property, including appurtenant land and
improvements and personal property, that are normally operated together to produce electric power from wind
and that have a nameplate capacity greater than or equal to 25 megawatts."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Decommissioning period -- requirements. (1) The owner of a wind
generation or solar facility shall begin decommissioning within 12 months after abandonment or the end of its
useful life. Decommissioning must be completed within 24 months after abandonment or the end of its useful
life unless the department approves a plan specifying the steps and schedules to return the facility to operation.
(2) Decommissioning the facility includes but is not limited to:
(a) dismantling, removal, and disposal of all panels, plates, towers, turbine generators,
transformers, fencing, overhead cables, inverters, substations and any other associated equipment;
(b) removal of all underground cabling;
(c) removal of all cement, foundations, buildings, and ancillary equipment; and
(d) site restoration and reclamation to the approximate original topography that existed prior to the
construction of the facility with topsoil respread over the disturbed areas at a depth similar to that in existence
prior to the disturbance.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
(3) If a decommissioning plan includes in-state disposal, the disposal of materials is subject to the
provisions of Title 75, chapter 10.
(4) If a property owner and the owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility located on the
property of the property owner reach an agreement concerning alternative restoration of buildings, cabling,
electrical components, roads, or any other associated facilities, instead of removal, or alternative plans for
reclamation of surface lands, or both, decommissioning does not include removal, plans for reclamation, or
both, if a copy of the agreement is provided to the department.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Decommissioning plan. (1) (a) Prior to the construction and
commencement of operation of a wind generation or solar facility, the owner of a wind generation facility or
solar facility operating in Montana shall:
(i) notify the department in writing of the date that the facility intends to begin construction and
commercial operation;
(ii) subject to [section 2], submit a plan for decommissioning the facility to the department,
including the scope of work to be completed and cost estimates for completion;
(iii) if applicable, provide the department a copy of the commission-approved power purchase
agreement as described in 69-8-421;
(iv) provide the department with any other necessary information in accordance with this part and
rules adopted pursuant to this part in order for the department to determine bond requirements in accordance
with 75-26-304; and
(v) submit a decommissioning bond for the facility to the department in the amount calculated by
the department pursuant to 75-26-304.
(b) If a wind generation facility or solar facility was constructed and commenced commercial
operation before January 1, 2026, and the owner of the facility submitted information required by subsection
(1)(a) on or before this date, the owner is not required to resubmit the information.
(2) (a) If necessary, the department may modify a plan for decommissioning to determine bond
requirements in accordance with 75-26-304.
(b) The department shall notify the owner of the facility of any modification. The owner of the wind
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
generation facility or solar facility may appeal a modification by the department of a plan for decommissioning to
the board within 60 days after receiving notice of the modification to the plan.

Section 4. Section 75-26-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-26-304. Bond Decommissioning bond -- exemptions -- penalty for failure to submit. (1) (a)
Within 12 months of a wind generation facility or solar facility commencing commercial operation, the owner of
a wind generation facility or solar facility operating in Montana shall:
(i) notify the department in writing of the date that the facility began commercial operation;
(ii) subject to subsection (2), submit a plan for decommissioning the facility to the department,
including the scope of work to be completed and cost estimates for completion; and
(iii) provide the department with any other necessary information in accordance with this part and
rules adopted pursuant to this part in order for the department to determine bond requirements in accordance
with this section.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (1)(c), if a wind generation facility or solar facility commenced
commercial operation before May 7, 2019, the owner of the facility shall submit to the department the
information required in subsection (1)(a) on or before July 1, 2020.
(c) If a wind generation facility commenced commercial operation before May 7, 2019, and the
owner of the facility submitted information required by subsection (1)(a) on or before July 1, 2018, the owner is
not required to resubmit the information.
(2) If a property owner and the owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility reach an
agreement concerning alternative restoration of buildings, cabling, electrical components, roads, or any other
associated facilities, instead of removal, or alternative plans for reclamation of surface lands, or both,
decommissioning does not include removal, plans for reclamation, or both, as long as a copy of the agreement
is provided to the department.
(3) (a) If necessary, the department may modify a plan for decommissioning to determine bond
requirements in accordance with subsections (4) through (8).
(b) The department shall notify the owner of the facility of any modification. The owner of the wind
generation facility or solar facility may appeal a modification by the department of a plan for decommissioning to
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
the board within 60 days of receiving notice of the modification to the plan.
(4) In determining the amount of a the initial decommissioning bond required in accordance with
subsection (6) (2), the department shall consider:
(a) the character and nature of the site where the wind generation facility or solar facility is located;
and
(b) the current market salvage value of the wind generation facility or solar facility, as determined
by an independent evaluator; and.
(c) estimated contracting, equipment, and personnel costs.
(2) The final amount of the decommissioning bond a facility must pay prior to the construction of
the facility is 125% of the initial bond amount calculated pursuant to subsection (1).
(5)(3) Except as provided in subsections (7) (5) and (8) (6) and in accordance with subsection (6), the
owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility shall submit to the department a decommissioning bond
payable to the state of Montana in a form acceptable by the department and in the sum determined by the
department pursuant to subsection (2), conditioned on the faithful decommissioning of the wind generation
facility or solar facility.
(6)(4) (a) Except as provided in subsections (7) (5) and (8) (6), if a wind generation facility or solar
facility was constructed and commenced commercial operation on or before January 1, 2007 2026, the operator
shall submit the decommissioning bond to the department on or before January 1, 2026, prior to the conclusion
of the 16th year to continue of operation of the wind generation facility or solar facility without penalty as
provided in subsection (7).
(b) Except as provided in subsections (7) and (8), if a wind generation facility or solar facility
commenced commercial operation after January 1, 2007, the operator shall submit the decommissioning bond
to the department prior to the conclusion of the 15th year of operation of the wind generation facility or solar
facility.
(7)(5) If a wind generation facility or solar facility is repurposed, as determined by the department in
consultation with the owner, the owner is not required to provide a bond, and any existing bond must be
released until the repurposed facility reaches its 5th year of operation.
(8)(6) An owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility is exempt from the requirements of
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
subsection (6) (4) if:
(a) the owner posts a bond with a federal agency, with the department of natural resources and
conservation for the lease of state land, or with a tribal, county, or local government;
(b) the owner furnishes documents to the department that prove the owner is responsible under
the terms and conditions of a lease agreement to provide private bonding. The parties shall agree that release
of the agreed upon bond is subject to the approval of the department upon completion of reclamation.
(c) the private landowner on whose land the wind generation facility or solar facility is located owns
a 10% or greater share of the wind generation facility or solar facility, as determined by the department; or
(d) the facility:
(i) commenced commercial operation on or before January 1, 2018, is a wind generation facility,
and has less than 25 megawatts in nameplate capacity; or
(ii) commenced commercial operation on or before January 1, 2020, is a solar facility, and has less
than 2 megawatts in nameplate capacity.
(9)(7) (a) If the owner of the wind generation facility or solar facility fails to submit a decommissioning
bond acceptable to the department within the timeframe required by this section, the department shall provide
notice to the facility owner. If after 30 days the owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility has not
submitted a decommissioning bond, the department may assess an administrative penalty of not more than
$1,500 and an additional administrative penalty of not more than $1,500 for each day the failure to submit the
decommissioning bond continues.
(b) The owner of the wind generation facility or solar facility may appeal the department's penalty
assessment to the board within 20 days after receipt of written notice of the penalty. The contested case
provisions of the Montana Administrative Procedure Act, Title 2, chapter 4, part 6, apply to a hearing before the
board under this subsection (9) (7).
(10)(8) If the owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility transfers ownership of the facility to a
successor owner, the first owner's bond must be released after 90 days. The new owner shall submit any
necessary bond within 90 days after transfer of ownership or be subject to penalties in accordance with this
section.
(9) (a) The department shall review each decommissioning plan and bond amount annually after a
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
facility is bonded or when a new owner submits a revised decommissioning plan. The department may increase
the amount of the bond if the facility has expanded or the cost to decommission a facility has otherwise
increased due to inflation.
(b) If the department determines that the bond amount must be increased, it shall mail to the
owner a written justification for the increase. The owner shall increase the bond amount within 90 days after the
date the written justification was mailed to avoid penalties in accordance with this section.
(11)(10)Once every 5 years, the owner of a wind generation facility or solar facility may submit an
amended plan for the department's approval. As part of the submission, the owner of a wind generation facility
or solar facility may also apply to the department for a reduction in the amount of the decommissioning bond
applicable to the wind energy facility or solar facility. The owner's application to the department must include a
detailed description of any material changes to information considered by the department in setting the initial
amount of the bond.
(12)(11)Submitting a bond in accordance with this section does not absolve the owner of a wind
generation facility or solar facility from complying with applicable regulations and requirements for:
(a) areas subject to local zoning adopted under Title 76, chapter 2;
(b) military affected areas under Title 10, chapter 1, part 15; or
(c) airport affected areas under Title 67, chapter 7."

Section 5. Section 75-26-308, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-26-308. Wind and solar decommissioning account -- use of existing resources. (1) There is
a wind and solar decommissioning account within the state special revenue fund established in 17-2-102. There
must be paid into the account:
(a) penalties collected in accordance with 75-26-304(9)(7); and
(b) interest income earned on the account.
(2) Funds in the wind and solar decommissioning account are statutorily appropriated, as provided
in 17-7-502, to the department.
(3) (a) Money in the account may only be used by the department in implementing this part and
rules adopted pursuant to this part.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
(b) The department shall administer this part using existing resources and money in the account
pursuant to subsection (1).
(4) The department shall maintain and hold bonds or other surety received by the department as
authorized in 75-26-304 for use in accordance with this part."

Section 6. Section 75-26-310, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-26-310. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules prescribing:
(1) standards and procedures for the submission of reasonable bonds with good and sufficient
surety by the owners of wind generation facilities and solar facilities;
(2) the collection of penalties in accordance with 75-26-304(9)(7);
(3) criteria and the process for releasing a bond in accordance with 75-26-309;
(4) the department's use of a bond in the event that the owner of a wind generation facility or solar
facility fails to decommission a wind generation facility or solar facility;
(5) information required by the department to determine bond requirements in accordance with 75-
26-304; and
(6) any additional requirements to ensure compliance with this part."

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Codification instruction. [Sections 2 and 3] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 75, chapter 26, part 3, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 26, part 3, apply to
[sections 2 and 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 160.1
- END -
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – SB 160